New York, session 2025-2026, S3068.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The private housing finance law is amended by adding a new 2 section 615 to read as follows: 3 § 615. Tenant to homeownership initiative. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, "low income or rent subsidized apartment" shall mean an apart- 5 ment in which the tenant's household income level qualifies them to 6 receive state funds used towards the monthly amount of rent owed. 7 2. The division of housing and community renewal shall create the 8 process, access the applications, distribute the funds and provide any 9 other administrative functions for the tenant to homeownership initi- 10 ative. The state shall subsidize a portion of the closing costs 11 required of any buyer who is purchasing a home located within the state 12 if they shall meet the following requirements: 13 (a) the buyer has been a resident of the state for five years prior to 14 entering into a purchase contract to buy a home; and 15 (b) the buyer has been a tenant of a public housing project or in a 16 low income or rent subsidized apartment for the entirety of such five 17 year period. 18 3. If a buyer meets the requirements of subdivision two of this 19 section, the state shall subsidize the following amounts for such buyer 20 to be used towards such closing costs: 21 (a) one thousand dollars if such buyer has resided in a public housing 22 project; or 23 (b) five hundred dollars if such buyer has resided in a low income or 24 rent subsidized apartment unit. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05925-01-5 S. 3068 2 1 4. This section shall apply only to buyers who receive approval and 2 are financing such purchase with a conventional or federal housing 3 administration (FHA) loan. 4 5. The state shall claw back any subsidized amount provided to any 5 buyer who qualified and received such subsidized amount from the state 6 under this section if such buyer sells or transfers the title of the 7 subject property within a period of three years from the date of clos- 8 ing. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.